Idaho, session 2026, H0773.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. IDAHO CODE CLEANUP -- LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent
of the Legislature to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are
streamlined, up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best
serving the public health, safety, and welfare. In accordance with the Idaho
Code Cleanup Act, following comprehensive review, the Legislature has iden-
tified the provisions of this act as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary.
SECTION 2. That Section 26-2128, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


26-2128. LIQUIDITY REQUIREMENTS. (a) Every credit union shall have
on hand as a liquidity reserve an amount equal to four percent (4%) of its
outstanding shares, certificates of deposit, and certificates of indebted-
ness. Share or deposit accounts from which a member may withdraw funds by
the use of a negotiable instrument shall be subject to the liquidity reserve
requirements of subsection (b) of this section and not to the liquidity re-
serve requirements of this subsection. Said liquidity reserves, except as
hereinafter otherwise provided, shall be kept in cash on hand or on deposit
subject to check or draft, with any bank or banks or corporate credit union
located in the state of Idaho, which shall have been approved by the director
as liquidity reserve depositories and shall be computed monthly as follows:
on the basis of average daily bank deposits and average daily cash on hand.
(b) Every credit union which provides for its member's share or deposit
accounts from which the member may withdraw funds by the use of negotiable
instrument shall have on hand as a liquidity reserve in addition to the liq-
uidity reserve required by subsection (a) of this section an amount equal
to ten percent (10%) of its share and deposit accounts which are subject to
withdrawal by the use of negotiable instrument. Said liquidity reserves
shall be kept in cash on hand or on deposit subject to check or draft, with any
bank or banks or corporate credit union located in the state of Idaho which
shall have been approved by the director as liquidity reserve depositories
and shall be computed monthly as follows: on the basis of average daily bank
or corporate credit union deposits, and average daily cash on hand.
(c) Certificates of deposit issued by the Idaho Corporate Credit Union
may be included in meeting the requirements of this section. To the extent a
credit union is required to maintain reserves pursuant to the monetary con-
trol act of 1980 and the implementing regulations of the board of governors
of the federal reserve system, as the same is presently enacted and as it may
be amended in the future, the reserves required to be so maintained shall be
considered as a part of, and not in addition to, the liquidity reserves re-
quired by this section.
SECTION 3. That Section 26-2170, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 26-2171, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 26-2172, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 26-2173, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 26-2174, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 8. That Section 26-2175, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 9. That Section 26-2176, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 10. That Section 26-2177, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 11. That Section 26-2178, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 12. That Section 26-2179, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 13. That Section 26-2180, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 14. That Section 26-2181, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 15. That Section 26-2182, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 16. That Section 26-2183, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 17. That Section 26-2184, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 18. That Section 26-2185, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 19. That Section 26-2186, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 20. That Section 27-406, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 21. That Section 27-409, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 22. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.